Vermont, session 2025-2026, S196.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 5252 is amended to read:
§ 5252. LEVY AND NOTICE OF SALE; SECURING PROPERTY
(a) When the collector of taxes of a town or of a municipality within it has
for collection a tax assessed against real estate in the town and the taxpayer
owes a minimum of $1,500.00 and is delinquent for a period longer than one
year, the collector may extend a warrant on such land. However, no warrant
shall be extended until a delinquent taxpayer is given an opportunity to enter a
VT LEG #385572 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.196
2026 Page 2 of 9
written reasonable repayment plan pursuant to subsection (c) of this section. If
a collector receives notice from a mobile home park owner pursuant to 10
V.S.A. § 6248(b), the collector shall, within 15 days after the notice,
commence tax sale proceedings to hold a tax sale within 60 days after the
notice. If the collector fails to initiate such proceedings, the town may initiate
tax sale proceedings only after complying with 10 V.S.A. § 6249(f). If the tax
collector extends the warrant, the collector shall:
(1) File in the office of the town clerk for record a true and attested copy
of the warrant and so much of the tax bill committed to the collector for
collection as relates to the tax against the delinquent taxpayer, a sufficient
description of the land so levied upon, and a statement in writing that by virtue
of the original tax warrant and tax bill committed to the collector for
collection, the collector has levied upon the described land.
(2) Advertise forthwith such land for sale at public auction in the town
where it lies three weeks successively in a newspaper circulating in the
vicinity, the last publication to be at least 10 days before such sale.
(3) Give the delinquent taxpayer written notice by certified mail
requiring a return receipt directed to the last known address of the delinquent
of the date and place of such sale at least 30 days prior thereto if the delinquent
is a resident of the town and 30 days prior thereto if the delinquent is a
nonresident of the town. If the notice by certified mail is returned unclaimed:
VT LEG #385572 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.196
2026 Page 3 of 9
(A) notice shall be provided to the taxpayer by resending the notice
by first-class mail or by personal service pursuant to Rule 4 of the Vermont
Rules of Civil Procedure; and
(B) notice shall be provided by email, provided the tax collector can
acquire the email address of the delinquent taxpayer using reasonable effort;
and
(C) notice shall be affixed to the front door of the property subject to
tax sale, provided it has a structure.
(4) Give to the mortgagee or lien holder of record written notice of such
sale at least 30 days prior thereto if a resident of the town and, if a nonresident,
30 days’ notice to the mortgagee or lien holder of record or the mortgagee’s or
lien holder’s agent or attorney by certified mail requiring a return receipt
directed to the last known address of such person. If the notice by certified
mail is returned unclaimed, notice shall be provided by resending the notice by
first-class mail or by personal service pursuant to Rule 4 of the Vermont Rules
of Civil Procedure.
(5) Post a notice of such sale in some public place in the town.
(6) Enclose the following statement, with directions to a resource
translating the notice into the five most common non-English languages used
in this State, with the notices required under subdivisions (3) and (4) of this
subsection and with every delinquent tax notice: Warning: There are unpaid
VT LEG #385572 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.196
2026 Page 4 of 9
property taxes at (address of property), which you may own, or have a legal
interest, in or which may be contiguous to your property. The property will be
sold at public auction on (date set for sale) unless the overdue taxes, fees, and
interest in the amount of (dollar amount due) is paid. To make payment or
receive further information, contact (name of tax collector) immediately at
(office address), (mailing address), (email address), or (telephone number).
(7) The resource for translation of the notice required under subdivision
(6) of this subsection shall be made available to all municipalities by the
Vermont Department of Taxes.
(b)(1) If the warrant and levy for delinquent taxes has been recorded
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the municipality in which the real
estate lies may secure the property against illegal activity, damage from
exposure to the elements, deterioration, and potential fire hazards after giving
the mortgagee or lien holder of record written notice at least 10 days prior to
such action.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, when a
warrant and levy for delinquent taxes has been recorded pursuant to subsection
(a) of this section, it shall be for all delinquent taxes due at the time the warrant
and levy is filed.
(c)(1) A municipality shall not initiate a tax sale proceeding until it has,
after attempting to consult with the taxpayer, offered a delinquent taxpayer a
VT LEG #385572 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.196
2026 Page 5 of 9
written reasonable repayment plan and the taxpayer has either denied the offer,
failed to respond within 30 days, or failed to make a payment under the plan
within the time frame established by the collector. When establishing a plan
under this subsection, the municipality may request related information and
shall consider the following:
(A) the income and income schedule of the taxpayer, if offered by the
taxpayer;
(B) the taxpayer’s tax payment history with the municipality;
(C) the amount of tax debt owed to the municipality;
(D) the amount of time tax has been delinquent; and
(E) the taxpayer’s reason for the delinquency, if offered by the
taxpayer.
(2) A collector is only required to offer one payment plan per
delinquency, without regard for whether it is agreed to by the delinquent
taxpayer.
(3) A collector may void a payment plan and proceed to tax sale if a
delinquent taxpayer agrees to a payment plan under this subsection and fails to
make a timely payment.
VT LEG #385572 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.196
2026 Page 6 of 9
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. § 5253 is amended to read:
§ 5253. FORM OF ADVERTISEMENT AND NOTICE OF SALE
The form of advertisement and notice of sale provided for in section 5252
of this title shall be substantially in the following form:
The resident and nonresident owners, lien holders, and mortgagees of lands in
the town of __________ in the county of __________ are hereby notified that
the taxes assessed by such town for the years ______ (insert years the taxes are
unpaid) ______ remain, either in whole or in part, unpaid on the following
described lands in such town, to wit,
_________________________________________
_________________________________________
(insert description of lands)
and so much of such lands will be sold at public auction at ______ a public
place in such town, on the _____ day of ______ (month), ______ (year) at
______ o’clock ____ (am/pm), as shall be requisite to discharge such taxes
with costs and fees, unless previously paid.
Be advised that the owner or mortgagee, or the owner’s or mortgagee’s
representatives or assigns, of lands sold for taxes shall have a right to
redemption for a period of one year six months from the date of sale pursuant
to 32 V.S.A. § 5260.
VT LEG #385572 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.196
2026 Page 7 of 9
Dated at __________, Vermont, this ________ day of _______ (month), ____
(year).
_________________________________________
Collector of Town Taxes
Sec. 3. 32 V.S.A. § 5254a is added to read:
§ 5254a. ENTRY TO SECURE PROPERTY
After providing the mortgagee or lien holder of record written notice of at
least 10 days, the purchaser of real estate subject to this subchapter may enter
the property to secure the property against illegal activity, damage from
exposure to the elements, deterioration, and potential fire hazards.
Sec. 4. 32 V.S.A. § 5260 is amended to read:
§ 5260. REDEMPTION
(a) When the owner, lien holder, or mortgagee of lands sold for taxes, or
the owner’s, lien holder’s, or mortgagee’s representatives or assigns, within
one year six months from the day of sale, pays or tenders to the collector who
made the sale or in the case of the collector’s death or removal from the town
where the land lies, to the town clerk of such town, the sum for which the land
was sold with interest thereon calculated at a rate of one percent per month or
fraction thereof from the day of sale to the day of payment, a deed of the land
shall not be made to the purchaser, but the money paid or tendered by the
owner, lien holder, or mortgagee or the owner’s, lien holder’s, or mortgagee’s
VT LEG #385572 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.196
2026 Page 8 of 9
representatives or assigns to the collector or town clerk shall be paid over to
such purchaser on demand. In the event that a municipality purchases
contaminated land pursuant to section 5259 of this title, the cost to redeem
shall include all costs expended for assessment and remediation, including
expenses incurred or authorized by any local, State, or federal government
authority.
(b) During the redemption period, the tax collector shall:
(1) Serve the delinquent taxpayer with the written notice required under
subsection (c) of this section between 90 and 120 days prior to the end of the
redemption period using certified mail requiring a return receipt, directed to
the last known address of the delinquent taxpayer. If the notice by certified
mail is returned unclaimed, notice shall be provided by resending the notice by
first-class mail or by personal service pursuant to Rule 4 of the Vermont Rules
of Civil Procedure.
(2) Post the notice in some public place in the municipality between 90
and 120 days prior to the end of redemption period.
(c) The tax collector shall enclose the following statement, with directions
to a resource translating the notice into the five most common non-English
languages used in this State, with every notice required under this section:
Warning: There are unpaid property taxes at (address of property), which you
may own, or have a legal interest in, or which may be contiguous to your
VT LEG #385572 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.196
2026 Page 9 of 9
property. The property was sold at public auction on (date). Unless the
overdue taxes, fees, and interest are paid by (last day of redemption period),
the deed to the property will transfer to the purchaser. To redeem the property
and avoid losing your legal interest, you must pay (dollar amount due for
redemption). The amount you must pay to redeem the property increases every
month due to interest, mailing costs, and other costs. To make payment or
receive further information, contact (name of tax collector) immediately at
(office address), (mailing address), (email address), and (telephone number).
(d) The resource for translation of the notice required under subsection (c)
of this section shall be made available to all municipalities by the Vermont
Department of Taxes.
Sec. 5. APPLICATION OF CHANGES MADE BY THIS ACT
The amendments to 32 V.S.A. §§ 5253 and 5260 (notice and redemption)
shall not apply to a property that was subject to a notice of sale nor to a
property that has been sold at tax sale prior to July 1, 2026.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385572 v.1